server/LibreOfficePortable/App/libreoffice/share/extensions/dict-ru/ru_RU.aff
SFX V Y 179
SFX V   ться вутся        житься
SFX V   ться вусь         житься
SFX V   ться вешься       житься
SFX V   ться вется        житься
SFX V   ться ветесь       житься
SFX V   ться вемся        житься
SFX V   ться вёшься       житься
SFX V   ться вётся        житься
SFX V   ться вётесь       житься
SFX V   ться вёмся        житься
SFX V   ться нутся        деться
SFX V   ться нусь         деться
SFX V   ться нешься       деться
SFX V   ться нется        деться
SFX V   ться нетесь       деться
SFX V   ться немся        деться
SFX V   ться ешься        уться
SFX V   ться ется         уться
SFX V   ться етесь        уться
SFX V   ться емся         уться
SFX V   ться ются         уться
SFX V   ться юсь          уться
SFX V   ть   вут          жить
SFX V   ть   ву           жить
SFX V   ть   вешь         жить
SFX V   ть   вете         жить
SFX V   ть   вет          жить
SFX V   ть   вем          жить
SFX V   ть   вёшь         жить
SFX V   ть   вёте         жить
SFX V   ть   вёт          жить
SFX V   ть   вём          жить
SFX V   ть   нут          деть
SFX V   ть   ну           деть
SFX V   ть   нешь         деть
SFX V   ть   нете         деть
SFX V   ть   нет          деть
SFX V   ть   нем          деть
SFX V   ть   ешь          уть
SFX V   ть   ете          уть
SFX V   ть   ет           уть
SFX V   ть   ем           уть
SFX V   ть   ют           уть
SFX V   ть   ю            уть
SFX V   яться ешься        яться
SFX V   яться ется         яться
SFX V   яться етесь        яться
SFX V   яться емся         яться
SFX V   яться ются         яться
SFX V   яться юсь          яться
SFX V   яться ёшься        яться
SFX V   яться ётся         яться
SFX V   яться ётесь        яться
SFX V   яться ёмся         яться
SFX V   ять  ешь          ять
SFX V   ять  ете          ять
SFX V   ять  ет           ять
SFX V   ять  ем           ять
SFX V   ять  ют           ять
SFX V   ять  ю            ять
SFX V   ять  ёшь          ять
SFX V   ять  ёте          ять
SFX V   ять  ёт           ять
SFX V   ять  ём           ять
SFX V   оваться уешься       оваться
SFX V   оваться уется        оваться
SFX V   оваться уетесь       оваться
SFX V   оваться уемся        оваться
SFX V   оваться уются        оваться
SFX V   оваться уюсь         оваться
SFX V   оваться уёшься       оваться
SFX V   оваться уётся        оваться
SFX V   оваться уётесь       оваться
SFX V   оваться уёмся        оваться
SFX V   овать уешь         овать
SFX V   овать уете         овать
SFX V   овать ует          овать
SFX V   овать уем          овать
SFX V   овать уют          овать
SFX V   овать ую           овать
SFX V   овать уёшь         овать
SFX V   овать уёте         овать
SFX V   овать уёт          овать
SFX V   овать уём          овать
SFX V   иться ьешься       [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьется        [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьетесь       [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьемся        [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьются        [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьюсь         [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьёшься       [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьётся        [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьётесь       [блпв]иться
SFX V   иться ьёмся        [блпв]иться
SFX V   ить  ьешь         [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьете         [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьет          [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьем          [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьют          [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ью           [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьёшь         [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьёте         [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьёт          [блпв]ить
SFX V   ить  ьём          [блпв]ить
SFX V   хаться дутся        хаться
SFX V   хаться дусь         хаться
SFX V   хаться дешься       хаться
SFX V   хаться дется        хаться
SFX V   хаться детесь       хаться
SFX V   хаться демся        хаться
SFX V   хать дут          хать
SFX V   хать ду           хать
SFX V   хать дешь         хать
SFX V   хать дете         хать
SFX V   хать дет          хать
SFX V   хать дем          хать
SFX V   ечься яжешься      лечься
SFX V   ечься яжется       лечься
SFX V   ечься яжетесь      лечься
SFX V   ечься яжемся       лечься
SFX V   ечься ягутся       лечься
SFX V   ечься ягусь        лечься
SFX V   ечь  яжешь        лечь
SFX V   ечь  яжете        лечь
SFX V   ечь  яжет         лечь
SFX V   ечь  яжем         лечь
SFX V   ечь  ягут         лечь
SFX V   ечь  ягу          лечь
SFX V   еваться уется        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться уются        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться уётся        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юешься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юется        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юетесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юемся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юются        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться ююсь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юёшься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юётся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юётесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   еваться юёмся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX V   евать уешь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать уете         [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать ует          [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать уем          [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать уют          [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать ую           [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать уёшь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать уёте         [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать уёт          [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать уём          [цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юешь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юете         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юет          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юем          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юют          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юю           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юёшь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юёте         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юёт          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   евать юём          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX V   аться лешься       паться
SFX V   аться лется        паться
SFX V   аться летесь       паться
SFX V   аться лемся        паться
SFX V   аться лются        паться
SFX V   аться люсь         паться
SFX V   ать  ут           дать
SFX V   ать  у            дать
SFX V   ать  лешь         пать
SFX V   ать  лете         пать
SFX V   ать  лет          пать
SFX V   ать  лем          пать
SFX V   ать  лют          пать
SFX V   ать  лю           пать
SFX V   ать  ешь          дать
SFX V   ать  ете          дать
SFX V   ать  ет           дать
SFX V   ать  ем           дать
